District of Columbia statutes.
22-1011

Neglect of sick or disabled animals.

If any maimed, sick, infirm, or disabled animal shall fail to receive proper food or shelter from said owner or person in charge of the same for more than 5 consecutive hours, such person shall, for every such offense, be punished in the same manner provided in § 22-1001.

Aug. 23, 1871, Leg. Assem., p. 138, ch. 106, § 10
June 25, 1892, 27 Stat. 60, ch. 135, § 4
This section is referenced in § 22-1012 and § 22-1013.
1981 Ed., § 22-811.
1973 Ed., § 22-811.